New Jersey, session 222, A4507.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Board of Public Utilities shall discontinue the Infrastructure Investment Program established by the board pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the board and published in the New Jersey Administrative Code.  Beginning on the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the board shall not: (1)   accept any new Infrastructure Investment Program petitions; or (2)   approve any pending Infrastructure Investment Program petition without conducting a full rate review for the public utility whose petition under the program is pending on the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    The board shall require any public utility with a pending Infrastructure Investment Program petition on the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) to either: (1)   include the public utilitys investment proposal, formerly included in the pending petition, in the public utilitys next base rate case; or (2)   provide all information necessary for a full rate review, in order for the board to process the public utilitys Infrastructure Investment Program petition, within 90 days of a board order to this effect.  In the event that a public utility fails to provide the required information within 90 days of a board order, the petition shall be deemed retracted by the public utility.  Alternatively, the board may, in its discretion, authorize a new deadline for the public utility to provide all information necessary for a full rate review.  In the event that a public utility fails to provide the required information prior to a subsequent deadline set by the board, the petition shall be deemed retracted by the public utility and shall no longer be eligible for consideration independently from the public utilitys base rate case. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.